Tennessee statutes. Title 42 Aeronautics
Part 3

Tennessee Aeronautics Commission

42-2-301. Creation.

There is created an advisory agency to be known as the Tennessee aeronautics commission to consist of five (5) members of whom at least one (1) but not more than two (2) shall live in each grand division of the state.

The members of the commission shall be appointed by the governor for terms to expire in one (1), two (2), three (3), four (4), and five (5) years, respectively, after July 1, 1969.

The successors of the members originally appointed shall be appointed for terms of five (5) years in the same manner as the members originally appointed under this chapter, except that any person appointed to fill a vacancy occurring prior to the expiration of the term for which that person's predecessor was appointed shall be appointed only for the remainder of the term.

Each member shall serve until the appointment and qualification of the member's successor.

All members shall be citizens and bona fide residents of the state and shall be persons qualified by their knowledge of and experience and interest in aeronautics.

To the extent feasible, the commission shall include a person of good standing and reputation in each of the following fields: engineering, law, industry or commerce and finance.

At least one (1) member shall be connected with the general aviation industry and at least one (1) member shall be a resident of an urban area.

The members shall be paid the sum of twenty-five dollars ($25.00) per day for each day actually spent in the discharge of their official duties; provided, that not in excess of three thousand dollars ($3,000) shall be paid to the chair in any one (1) year; and provided further, that not in excess of one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500) shall be paid to any one (1) member in one (1) year. In addition, the members shall be reimbursed for actual and necessary expenses incurred by them in the performance of their duties.

All reimbursement for travel expenses shall be in accordance with the comprehensive travel regulations as promulgated by the department of finance and administration and approved by the attorney general and reporter.

The members may be removed by the governor for inefficiency, neglect of duty, or malfeasance in office in the manner provided by law for the removal of other public officials for like causes.

The commission shall, within thirty (30) days after its appointment, organize, adopt a seal, and make such rules and regulations for its administration, not inconsistent with this section, as it may deem expedient, and may from time to time amend and add to the rules and regulations.

At the organization meeting it shall elect from among its members a chair, a vice chair, and a secretary, to serve for one (1) year, and annually thereafter shall elect such officers, all to serve until their successors are appointed and qualified.

The commission shall at its initial meeting fix the date and place for its regular meeting.

Three (3) members shall constitute a quorum, and no action shall be taken by less than a majority of the commission.

Special meetings may be called as provided by its rules and regulations.

Regular meetings shall be held at the commission's established offices, but, whenever the convenience of the public or of the parties may be promoted, or delay or expense may be prevented, it may hold meetings, hearings, or proceedings at any other place designated by it.

The commission shall serve in an advisory capacity to the commissioner and shall have the duty and responsibility to:

Assist in the formulation of relevant policy planning; and

Approve or disapprove all proposed changes in the state airport system plan, existing under the authority of § 42-2-204; provided, that approval or disapproval shall not affect any changes to the airport plan that may be required by the master transportation plan or any changes required to coordinate facilities with any other bureau within the department.

Acts 1957, ch. 374, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; 1969, ch. 82, § 2; 1970, ch. 554, § 1; 1972, ch. 829, § 16; 1976, ch. 806, § 1(3); impl. am. Acts 1977, ch. 137, § 10; T.C.A., § 42-204; Acts 1981, ch. 264, § 14; T.C.A., §42-2-103; Acts 2007, ch. 227, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. The Tennessee aeronautics commission, created by this section, terminates June 30, 2021. See §§4-29-112,4-29-242.

Amendments. The 2007 amendment substituted “Three (3) members” for “Two (2) members” in (e)(1).

Effective Dates. Acts 2007, ch. 227, § 3. July 1, 2007.

Cross-References. Airport and aircraft security, §39-17-109.

Airport, annexation-free zone, §6-58-116.

Airport noise mitigation programs, §7-3-313.

Airport noise mitigation programs, §13-20-217.

Annexation of regional airport commission property, §6-51-117.

Government tort liability, title 29, ch. 20.

Grand divisions, title 4, ch. 1, part 2.

Loans for airports, title 4, ch. 31, part 6.

Municipal powers, title 6, ch. 54.

Tennessee insurance guaranty associations bonds, title 4, ch. 31, part 8.